Utah statutes.
9-8-206.   Historical magazine, books, documents, and microfilms -- Proceeds.

(1)  The division shall, under the direction of the board:

(a)  compile and publish an historical magazine to be furnished to supporting members of the society in accordance with membership subscriptions or to be sold independently of membership; and

(b)  publish and sell other books, documents, and microfilms at reasonable prices to be approved by the director.

(2)  Proceeds from sales under this section shall be retained in the treasury of the society.

